src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! neutral to vowel height and backness
NeutrVowHeight = [(%^VOWLower:|%^VOWRaise:)] ;

NeutrDiphPALTint = [(%^PALÄ:|%^PALE:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALÕ:|%^PALÂ:|%^PALI:)] ;


!! possible triggers before PALE PALÄ
NeutrVowLenghtHeight = [ NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeight] ;

NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphTint = [NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint ] ;

!! possible triggers between stem and PALNo and PAL
BetweenStemAndPALNo = [ NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) ] ;     


!! possible triggers between vowel length and consonant grade

NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) (%^PALNo:| %^PAL:) ] ;     

!! `NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ (%^VOWRaise:\|%^VOWLower:) ( ((%^PALÂ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:\|%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ:\|(%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)\| (%^Allegro:) (%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÂ:) (%^PALNo:\](%^PAL:) ) ) ;`

! [ (NeutrVowHeight ((%^PALÂ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:|%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ:|(%^PALÕ:|%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)| (%^Allegro:) (%^PALÕ:|%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALÂ:) (%^PALNo:|%^PAL:) ) ] ;

!! possible triggers between word end and consonant grade
NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL ];     


!! possible triggers between vowel length and Palatalization
BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint ] ;
!! `BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [(%^VOWLower:\|%^VOWRaise:) (%^PALÄ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:\](%^PALÂ:) ) ;`

BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [(NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:|(%^PALÂ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)] ;
!! `BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [((%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:\|(%^PALÂ:\](%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)) ;`

BetweenVowHeightAndMorph = [  (NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:|(%^PALÂ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:) ([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^C2CC:|%^XYY2XY:|%^K2GG:|%^KK2GG:|%^CC2CCC:|%^CCC2C:|%^CCC2CC:|%^XYY2VY:|%^XYY2VYY:|%^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;


BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^C2CC:|%^XYY2XY:|%^K2GG:|%^KK2GG:|%^CC2CCC:|%^CCC2C:|%^CCC2CC:|%^XYY2VY:|%^XYY2VYY:|%^KKK2GG:) ] ;


BetweenPALNoAndMorph = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^C2CC:|%^XYY2XY:|%^K2GG:|%^KK2GG:|%^CC2CCC:|%^CCC2C:|%^CCC2CC:|%^XYY2VY:|%^XYY2VYY:|%^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;

BetweenStemAndRightArrow = [NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow] ;
!! `BetweenStemAndRightArrow = [NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow] ;`

!! ### Penultimate vowel centers possible triggers before VOWLower and VOWRaise

PenNeutrVowLength = [(%^Pen: %^VV2V: |%^Pen: %^V2VV:)] ;
PenNeutrVowHeight = [(%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:)] ;
PenNeutrDiphPALTint = [(%^Pen: %^PALÄ:|%^Pen: %^PALE:|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:|%^Pen: %^PALÂ:|%^Pen: %^PALI:)] ;
PenAllegro = [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:|%^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^KK2GAllegro:|%^Pen: %^K2GAllegro:)];

PenBetweenStemAndPALNo = [PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) ] ;

PenNeutrVowLenghtHeight  = [ PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight] ;

PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphTint = [PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight PenNeutrDiphPALTint ] ;

PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight PenNeutrDiphPALTint (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo:| %^Pen: %^PAL:) ] ;


PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss = [PenNeutrVowLength [(PenNeutrVowHeight|%^Pen: %^U2Õ:) (PenNeutrDiphPALTint (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo:| %^Pen: %^PAL:))] ([%^Pen: %^C2CC:]|%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:|%^Allegro:|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:)] ;


PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^RmVow:|%^PenVow2a:)] ;
!! `PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^RmVow:\](%^PenVow2a:)) ;`

PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^Pen: %^C2CC:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^KK2GG:|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VYY:|%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;
!! `PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^Pen: %^C2CC:\|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:\|%^Pen: %^KK2GG:\|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:\|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:\|%^Pen: %^XYY2VYY:\](%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ) ;`

!! used in compounding Cmp/SgNom and Cmp/SgGen
SgNomGen = [((%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C:|(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2CC:|%^PALẸ:|[%^PALE:|%^PALÕ:] %^PAL: %^XYY2IY:|[%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:] %^PAL: %^XYY2XY:|((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG:|(%^PALE:) %^PAL:| ((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) (%^J2I:) %^CC2C:|%^PAL: %^XYY2VY:)];
!! `SgNomGen = [((%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C:\|(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2CC:\|%^PALẸ:\|[%^PALE:\|%^PALÕ:] %^PAL: %^XYY2IY:\|[%^PALẸ:\|%^PALE:] %^PAL: %^XYY2XY:\|((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG:\|(%^PALE:) %^PAL:\| ((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) (%^J2I:) %^CC2C:\](%^PAL: %^XYY2VY:));`


!! neutral to consonant length

CNeutrGrade = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:] |[%^C2CC:] |%^CC2CCC: |%^KK2GG: |%^KKK2GG: |%^XYY2VY: |%^XYY2VYY:|%^CCC2CC: )] ;
!! `CNeutrGrade = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:] \|[%^C2CC:] \|%^CC2CCC: \|%^KK2GG: \|%^KKK2GG: \|%^XYY2VY: \|%^XYY2VYY:\](%^CCC2CC: )) ;`

!! neutral to vowel and consonant length

NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade |CNeutrGrade] ; 
!! `NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade \](CNeutrGrade) ; `

NoVowRaise = \[ %^VOWRaise: | #]* [(∑) #|.#.] ;
!! `NoVowRaise = \[ %^VOWRaise: \| #]* [#\](.#.) ;`

NoCnsDummy = \[ %^CC2C: | %^CCC2C: | %^CCC2CC: | %^XYY2IY: | %^XYY2XY: | %^KK2GG: | %^XYY2VY: | %^KKK2GG: | %^KKK2ZERO: | %^C2CC: | %^J2I: | %^RmCns: | %^K2GG: | # ]* ;
!! `NoCnsDummy = \[ %^CC2C: \| %^CCC2C: \| %^CCC2CC: \| %^XYY2IY: \| %^XYY2XY: \| %^KK2GG: \| %^XYY2VY: \| %^KKK2GG: \| %^KKK2ZERO: \| %^C2CC: \| %^J2I: \| %^RmCns: \| %^K2GG: \]( # )* ;`

SurfaceDiphthong = [ :e :ä | :e :â | :i :õ | :i :â | :i :e | :i :ẹ | :u :â | :u :õ | :u :å | :u :ä | :u :e | :u :ẹ ] ;
!! `SurfaceDiphthong = [ :e :ä \| :e :â \| :i :õ \| :i :â \| :i :e \| :i :ẹ \| :u :â \| :u :õ \| :u :å \| :u :ä \| :u :e \]( :u :ẹ ) ;`

!! * X3 = C Vx Cx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx ˈ Cx
!! * X2 = C Vx Vx Cx Cx  C Vx Vy Cx Cx
!! * X1 = C Vx Vx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx


!! # Rules
Rules

!! ## Vowel shortening rules



"Vowel shortening â:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 â:0 <=>
      [â:â|â:õ] _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:)  %^VV2V:  ;
    [OnSetC|PenUltCns|»]   _ (:ʼ|%{ʼØ%}:) [Cns:+|i:|n j|l m|s k:|s ǩ:|s t|š k:|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;

!Not needed here
!! čââʹđ+N+Sg+Ill: **heart/sydän**
!!€ čâ^1VOWđđ>ma
!!€ čâ0đđ>ma
    â: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -â
  e: _ (:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+|Cns:+ :ˈ Cns:+]  %^VV2V: ;
!! ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: **cook/keittää**
!!€ ǩeâ{ʹØ}tt^VV2V^VOWRaise^PALI^PAL
!!€ ǩi0ʹtt0000


"Vowel shortening ẹ:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 ẹ:0 <=>
   OnSetC ẹ: _ (u|i) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!! teevvad+V+Prt+4:
!!€ tẹẹvv^VV2V^VOWRaise>uš
!!€ ti0vv00>uš
   ẹ: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;


"Vowel shortening e:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 e:0 <=>
    e:  _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+  (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;

!! eʹǩrded+V+Inf
!!€ eeʹǩǩerd^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed
!!€ e0ʹǩ00rd00000>ed

   [OnSetC|PenUltCns]  _ (0:ʼ|%{ʼØ%}:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+|i:|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s m|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! Ââvel+N+Prop+Sg+Loc  **Ivalo**
!!€ Ââvel^RmVow>est
!!€ Ââv0l0>est
  e: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;


!! Jouste

"Vowel shortening å:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 å:0 <=>
  å: _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!  å: _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!! jååʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3 **trekk**
!!€ jåå{ʹØ}tt^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL>e
!!€ jo0ʹtt000>e
!! låʹǧsted
!!€ lååʹǧǧest^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow
!!€ lå0ʹǧ00st00000

!Not needed here
!! sååbbar+N+Sg+Nom **meeting**
!!€ så^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!€ sååbbar00
  å: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -å

"Vowel shortening õ:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 õ:0 <=>
  õ: _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) PenUltCns+ (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!!€ mõõ{ʹØ}nn^VV2V^PAL>e
!!€ mõ0ʹnn00>e
!!€ mõõ{ʹØ}nn^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e
!!€ mâ0ʹnn000>e
!!€ čõõnâst^Pen^VV2V^RmVow>ed
!!€ čõ0n0st000>ed
  õ: _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen: %^VV2V:  ;
!! tõiŋsǩed+V+Inf
!!€ tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed
!!€ tõ0iŋ0sǩ0000>ed
!!$ tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed
!!$ tõ0iŋ0sk0000>ed

! Is this needed 2016-05-03
      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;

!No needed here
!! kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Gen **tear**
!!€ kõ^1VOWnnjâl^Pen^VV2V^Pen^C2CC
!!€ kõ0nnjâl0000
  õ: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -õ

"Vowel shortening u:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 u:0 <=>
  u: _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;

      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! mainstummuš+N+Sg+Ill: **story telling/tarinointi**
!!€ mainstummuš^RmVow>a
!!€ mainstumm0š0>a

!Not needed here
!! juurd+N+Ess **thought**
!!€ ju^1VOWrdd>j>en
!!€ ju0rdd>j>en
   u: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

    _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! Oulu

"Vowel shortening i:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 i:0 <=>
    i: _ (u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^VV2V: ;
    i: _ (u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
!! viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
!!€ vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e
!!€ ve0ʹǩǩ000>e
!! viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
!!€ vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower>az
!!€ vẹ00kk00>az
!!$ vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower>az
!!$ vẹẹ0kk00>az
!! iilâsǩ:ilska

        PenUltCns  _ [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s m|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! prääʹzniǩ+N+Sg+Ill: **celebration/juhla**
!!€ prääʹzniǩ^RmVow^PALNo>a
!!€ prääʹzn0k00>a

      [Cns:|Vow:] _ (%^RmVow:) %^I2Zero: ;
!!€ žẹẹvai^RmVow^I2Zero>ǥa
!!€ žẹẹv0000>ǥa

          _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! +Sg+Ill N_HÕʹPPI
!!€ hõʹppi^UltRmVow>ǥa
!!€ hõʹpp00>ǥa
   i: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

"Vowel shortening o:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 o:0 <=>
    o: _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;
!! šoomm+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ šoomm^VV2V^VOWRaise>u
!!€ šu0mm00>u
!! ponjsted+V+Inf
!!€ poonjâst^Pen^VV2V^RmVow>ed
!!€ po0nj0st000>ed
!! poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
!!€ poorr^VV2V^VOWLower>az
!!€ på0rr00>az
    o: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

!! ooccâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
!!€ oocc^VV2V^VOWLower>az
!!€ å0cc00>az

    PenUltCns _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;

!Not needed here
!! ooumaž+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ o^1VOWumm^V2VV^XYY2XY>až
!!€ ooum000>až
 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -o

"Vowel shortening a:0 "
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 a:0 <=>
  a: _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;
!!€ saa{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^PAL>e
!!€ sa0ʹǩǩ00>e

!!€ maainâst^Pen^VV2V>ed
!!€ ma0inâst00>ed

    [OnSetC|PenUltCns]  _ (:ʼ|%{ʼØ%}:) [Cns:+|i:|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s m|s t|š ǩ:|š m] (%^Pen: %^VV2V:) PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! Aanar+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: **Inari/Enare**
!!€ Aanar^RmVow>a
!!€ Aan0r0>a

    :Vow+ (%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ - [Cns:* [l|n]]] _ i: %^RmVow:  ;
